Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-394
Registration; certain name and address changes; fee.

(1) Registration which is in the name of one spouse may be transferred to the other spouse for a fee of one dollar and fifty cents.

(2) So long as one registered name on a registration of a noncommercial motor vehicle or trailer remains the same, other names may be deleted therefrom or new names added thereto for a fee of one dollar and fifty cents.

(3) At any time prior to annual renewal beginning January 1, 2019, an owner may voluntarily update his or her address on the registration certificate upon payment of a fee of one dollar and fifty cents.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 94;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 33.